Utah statutes.
59-2-1706.   Land included as urban farming.

(1) (a)  Land under a structure used in or related to urban farming, including a barn, shed, silo, crib, or greenhouse, or under a facility used in or related to urban farming, including a lake, dam, pond, stream, or irrigation ditch, is included in determining the total area of land actively devoted to urban farming.

(b)  The land described in Subsection (1)(a) shall be included in determining if the land meets the urban farming production requirements of Subsection 59-2-1703(2)(a).

(2) (a)  Except as provided in this part, land under a residence and land used in connection with residential use may not be included in determining the total area of land actively devoted to urban farming.

(b)  Land described in Subsection (2)(a) shall be valued, assessed, and taxed in accordance with this chapter other than this part.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2012 General Session

